src-fst-morphology-affixes-adpositions.lexc.md
The Erzya language postpositions can be broken into many subgroups
according to morphological and semantic criteria

Some of the nouns have defective paradigms:
€ кудыкельганть

ало:ал
alo-SPAT-1Arg

This allows for possessor indices, word end or focus
e.g. вельде, вельдеяк, вельдензэ
?вельдензэль, вельдензэтне

This allows for word end, possessor indices, predication

postposition that is in ablative case
алдо:алдо

postposition that is in elative case
потсто:потсто

postposition that is in illative case
эземс:эзем

postposition that is in illative case
эйс:э

postposition that is in inessive case
эйсэ:эйсэ, кисэ

postposition that is in lative case
ютков:ютков

postposition that is in locative case
ало:ало

postposition that has no continuation пачк

postposition that is in ablative case
алдо:алдо

postposition that is in elative case
потсто:потсто

postposition that is in illative case
малас:мала

postposition that is in illative case
малас:мала

postposition that is in illative case
потс:пот

postposition that is in illative case
эйс:э

postposition that is in inessive case
потсо:потсо

postposition that is in lative case
алов:ало

postposition that is in locative case
ало:ало

postposition that is in prolative case
перька:перька

+Temp: K ;  перть

+Ela+Temp: PO_POSS_OR_END_FOC ;  пингстэ

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/adpositions.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-myv/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/adpositions.lexc)</small>
